Washington statutes.
RCW 35.10.240

Annexation—Canvass of votes.

In all cases of annexation, the county canvassing board or boards shall canvass the votes cast thereat.

In an election on the question of the annexation of all or a part of a city to another city, the votes cast in the city or portion thereof to be annexed shall be canvassed, and if a majority of the votes cast be in favor of annexation, the results shall be included in a statement indicating the total number of votes cast.

A proposition for the assumption of indebtedness outside the constitutional and/or statutory limits by the other city or cities in which the indebtedness did not originate shall be deemed approved if a majority of at least three-fifths of the voters of each city in which the indebtedness did not originate votes in favor thereof, and the number of persons voting on such proposition constitutes not less than forty percent of the total number of votes cast in such cities in which indebtedness did not originate at the last preceding general election: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That if general obligation bond indebtedness was incurred by action by the city legislative body, a proposition for the assumption of such indebtedness by the other city or cities in which such indebtedness did not originate shall be deemed approved if a majority of the voters of each city in which such indebtedness did not originate votes in favor thereof.

A duly certified copy of such statement of an annexation election shall be filed with the legislative body of each of the cities affected and recorded upon its minutes, and it shall be the duty of the clerk, or other officer performing the duties of clerk, of each of such legislative bodies, to transmit to the secretary of state and the office of financial management a duly certified copy of the record of such statement.

[ 1985 c 281 s 16; 1981 c 157 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 12; 1969 ex.s. c 89 s 7; 1967 c 73 s 17; 1965 c 7 s 35.10.240. Prior: 1929 c 64 s 5; RRS s 8909-5. Formerly RCW 35.10.070.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.

Validating—1929 c 64: "That the attempted consolidation of two or more contiguous municipal corporations pursuant to the provisions of either chapter 167 of the Laws of 1927 or chapter 293 of the Laws of 1927 be, and any such consolidation of any such cities or towns, is hereby in all respects validated." [ 1929 c 64 s 16.]

Canvassing returns, generally: Chapter 29A.60 RCW.

Conduct of elections—Canvass: RCW 29A.60.010.